Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6354.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3-7-27 of the General Laws in Chapter 3-7 entitled "Retail Licenses"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
3-7-27. Insurance requirements.
(a) In the town of Burrillville, an applicant for a license under this chapter shall file with
the application a certificate of insurance evidencing commercial, general-liability and property-
damage coverage in the minimum amount of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000); or for a
minimum amount to be set by ordinance. The certificate shall provide that the insurance shall not
be modified or cancelled unless prior, advance notice is given to the town of Burrillville and that
the town of Burrillville is named as an additional insured. A licensee must be insured by a carrier
licensed in this state.
(b) In the town of North Providence, an applicant for a license under this chapter shall file
with the application a certificate of insurance evidencing commercial, general-liability, and
property-damage coverage in the minimum amount of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000);
or for a minimum amount to be set by ordinance. The certificate shall provide that the insurance
shall not be modified or cancelled unless prior, advance notice is given to the town of North
Providence, according to the terms of the insurance policy, and that the town of North Providence
is named as an additional insured. A licensee must be insured by a carrier licensed in this state.
(c) In the town of Westerly, an applicant for a license under this chapter shall file with the
application a certificate of insurance evidencing commercial, general-liability and liquor liability

and property-damage coverage in the minimum amount of three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000); or for a minimum amount to be set by ordinance. The certificate shall provide that the
insurance shall not be modified or cancelled unless prior, advance notice is given to the town of
Westerly, according to the terms of the insurance policy, and that the town of Westerly is named
as an additional insured. A licensee must be insured by a carrier licensed in this state.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002945
========
LC002945 - Page 2 of 3